inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_am.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nizaaga'am
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: gizaaga'am
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: nizaaga'aamin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: gizaaga'aamin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: gizaaga'aam
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: zaaga'am
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: zaaga'amoog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: zaaga'amoon
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [zaaga'amoon,zaaga'amoo']
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: zaaga'aam
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [nizaaga'anziin,nizaaga'anzii]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [gizaaga'anziin,gizaaga'anzii]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: nizaaga'anziimin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: gizaaga'anziimin
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: gizaaga'anziim
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [zaaga'anziin,zaaga'anzii]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: zaaga'anziiwag
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: zaaga'anziiwan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [zaaga'anziiwan,zaaga'anziiwa']
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: zaaga'anziim
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: nizaaga'aanaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: gizaaga'aanaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: nizaaga'aaminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: gizaaga'aaminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: gizaaga'aamwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'amooban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [zaaga'amoobaniig,zaaga'amoobaneg]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [zaaga'amoobaniin,zaaga'amoobanen]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [zaaga'amoobaniin,zaaga'amoobanen]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: zaaga'aamwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: nizaaga'anziinaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: gizaaga'anziinaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: nizaaga'anziiminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: gizaaga'anziiminaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: gizaaga'anziimwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'anziiban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [zaaga'anziibaniig,zaaga'anziibaneg]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [zaaga'anziibaniin,zaaga'anziibanen]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [zaaga'anziibaniin,zaaga'anziibanen]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: zaaga'anziimwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: nizaaga'aanaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: gizaaga'aanaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: nizaaga'aaminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: gizaaga'aaminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: gizaaga'aamwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: [zaaga'amowidog,zaaga'amodog]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: [zaaga'amowidogenag,zaaga'amodogenan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: [zaaga'amowidogenan,zaaga'amodogenan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [zaaga'amowidogenan,zaaga'amodogenan]
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: zaaga'aamwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: nizaaga'anziinaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: gizaaga'anziinaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: nizaaga'anziiminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: gizaaga'anziiminaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: gizaaga'anziimwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: zaaga'anziidog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: zaaga'anziidogenag
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: zaaga'anziidogenan
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [zaaga'anziidogenan,zaaga'anziidogena']
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: zaaga'anziimwaadog
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'amogoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: zaaga'amogwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: zaaga'aminigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: zaaga'anziigoban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: zaaga'anziigwaaban
     zaaga'am+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: zaaga'anziinigoban
